New York, session 2025-2026, A4426.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 803-b of the correction law is amended by adding a new clause 3 (D) to read as follows: 4 (D) An incarcerated individual shall not be eligible for the credit 5 defined herein before having completed eighty percent of their original 6 sentence. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 8 sentences imposed on and after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06738-01-5